North Dakota, session 69, HB1614.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION STUDY - AUTONOMOUS AND
SEMIAUTONOMOUS VEHICLE TECHNOLOGIES - REPORT TO LEGISLATIVE
MANAGEMENT.
1. During the 2025-26 interim, the department of transportation shall study relevant
issues in order to develop a preemptive regulatory and statutory framework for the
operation of autonomous and semiautonomous vehicles on the North Dakota highway
system. The study must include:
a. A process for determining where the state's infrastructure may or may not be fully
prepared for widespread deployment of autonomous and semiautonomous
vehicle technologies;
b. A process to review accident and traffic data for autonomous and
semiautonomous vehicle systems with independent oversight on the industry
operators;
c. If there is a need to promulgate rules relating to accident liability regarding
autonomous and semiautonomous vehicle technologies; and
d. A determination of common vulnerabilities relating to privacy concerns and data
security with proposed solutions.
Page No. 1 25.1255.02000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
2. Before August 1, 2026, the department of transportation shall report its findings and
recommendations, together with any legislation required to implement the
recommendations, to the legislative management.
Page No. 2 25.1255.02000